Utah statutes.
63B-17-302.   Capital facility accounting authorizations.

The Legislature intends that Utah State University transfer $225,000 from its Capital Contingency Reserve Fund for State Funded Projects into its Capital Project Reserve Fund.



Enacted by Chapter 128, 2008 General Session

